Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,142
Violations; penalty.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of sections 81-8,128 to 81-8,142.01 or who assists another to violate the same, shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1957, c. 382, § 15, p. 1331;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 298;

Laws 1980, LB 849, § 16.